Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-471
Aquatic organisms; sale authorized; violation; penalty.

(1) Aquatic organisms propagated or raised under an aquaculture permit may be sold or offered for sale and transported at any time, subject to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission. The rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited to, tagging and reporting requirements.

(2) Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 181;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 53.